Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.7879 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Kentucky educational excellence scholarship awards shall be based upon an
established base scholarship amount and an eligible high school student's grade
point average. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, the base scholarship
amount for students attaining a grade point average of at least 2.5 for an[the 1998-
1999] academic year shall be as follows:
GPA Amount GPA Amount
2.50 $125.00 3.30 $325.00
2.60 $150.00 3.40 $350.00
2.70 $175.00 3.50 $375.00
2.75 $187.00 3.60 $400.00
2.80 $200.00 3.70 $425.00
2.90 $225.00 3.75 $437.00
3.00 $250.00 3.80 $450.00
3.10 $275.00 3.90 $475.00
3.20 $300.00 4.00 $500.00
3.25 $312.00
[The authority shall review the base amount of the Kentucky educational excellence
scholarship each academic year and may promulgate an administrative regulation to
make adjustments after considering the availability of funds.]
(b) The base amount of the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship:
1. Shall be annually adjusted by the authority based on the most recent
percent increase in the nonseasonally adjusted annual average
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City
Average, All Items, between the two (2) most recent calendar years
Page 1 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
available, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics
by administrative regulation, subject to the availability of funds,
beginning with grade point averages attained in the 2018-2019
academic year and each academic year thereafter;
2. May increase, but shall not be decreased;
3. Shall be paid at the most recent amount calculated for the academic
term in which a student utilizes his or her award;
4. Shall be provided at the adjusted amount identified in subparagraph 1.
of this paragraph for eligible high school students who graduated
prior to the 2021-2022 academic year and have received an eligibility
extension by the authority pursuant to subsection (5) of Section 3 of
this Act; and
5. Shall not be made available for retroactive payments due to an award
amount adjustment, pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph,
for prior academic terms.
(2) (a) The authority shall commit to provide to each eligible high school student the
base amount of the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship for each
academic year of high school study in the Kentucky educational excellence
scholarship curriculum that the high school student has attained at least a 2.5
grade point average. The award shall be based upon the eligible high school
student's grade point average at the close of each academic year, including
any[. An award attributable to a past academic year shall not be increased
after the award has been earned by an eligible high school student, regardless
of any] subsequent increases made to the base amount of the Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship[ through the promulgation of an
administrative regulation] by the authority in accordance with subsection
(1)(b) of this section.
Page 2 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
(b) Notwithstanding the definitions of "eligible high school student" and "high
school" in KRS 164.7874, any high school student who maintains Kentucky
residency and completes the academic courses that are required for a
Kentucky educational excellence scholarship while participating in an
approved educational high school foreign exchange program or participating
in the United States Congressional Page School may apply his or her grade
point average for that academic year toward the base as described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection. The grade point average shall be reported by
the student's Kentucky home high school, based on an official transcript from
the school that the student attended during the out-of-state educational
experience. The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations that
describe the approval process for the educational exchange programs that
qualify under this paragraph. The provisions in this paragraph shall likewise
apply to any Kentucky high school student who participated in an approved
educational exchange program or in a Congressional Page School[ since the
1998-99 school year] and maintained his or her Kentucky residency
throughout.
(c) 1. Notwithstanding the definitions of "eligible high school student" and
"high school" in KRS 164.7874 and the requirement that a student
graduate from a Kentucky high school, a high school student who
completes the KEES curriculum while attending an accredited out-of-
state high school or Department of Defense school may apply the grade
point average for any applicable academic year toward the base as
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection and shall also qualify for a
supplemental award under subsection (3) of this section when:
a. His or her custodial parent or guardian is in active service of the
Armed Forces of the United States;
Page 3 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
b. The student attended an accredited out-of-state high school or a
Department of Defense school as a result of the custodial parent's
or guardian's military transfer outside of Kentucky; and
c. The student earned a KEES base amount at a Kentucky high
school prior to the custodial parent's or guardian's military transfer
outside of Kentucky.
2. The student or parent shall arrange for the out-of-state school to report
the student's grade point average each academic year and the student's
highest ACT score to the authority as required under KRS 164.7885.
The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations implementing
the requirements in this paragraph, including:
a. The documentation that the parent shall submit to the authority
establishing the student's eligibility for the scholarship; and
b. The assurances that an out-of-state institution shall submit to the
authority for submission of the student grade point average.
[3. The provisions in this paragraph shall apply to the 2001-2002 school
year and thereafter.]
(d) [Beginning with the 2013-2014 academic year, ]A student who meets the
Kentucky core academic standards for high school graduation established in
administrative regulation and graduates after completing three (3) years of
high school shall receive a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship
award equivalent to completing high school in four (4) years. The award shall
be determined by dividing the total actual KEES scholarship earned under
subsection (1) of this section by three (3) and multiplying that number by four
(4). The resulting number shall be the annual award the student is eligible for
under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) (a) [The authority shall commit to provide to each eligible high school student
Page 4 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
graduating from high school before June 30, 1999, and achieving a score of at
least 15 on the American College Test, a supplemental award for the award
period beginning in the fall of 1999, based on the eligible high school
student's highest ACT score attained by the date of graduation from high
school. The amount of the supplemental award shall be determined as follows:
ACT Annual ACT Annual
Score Bonus Score Bonus
15 $21 22 $171
16 $43 23 $193
17 $64 24 $214
18 $86 25 $236
19 $107 26 $257
20 $129 27 $279
21 $150 28 or above $300
Subsequent supplemental awards for eligible high school students graduating
before June 30, 1999, shall be determined in accordance with the provisions
of paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) ]The authority shall commit to provide to each eligible high school student
upon achievement[ after June 30, 1999,] of an ACT score of at least 15 on the
American College Test a supplemental award based on the eligible high
school student's highest ACT score attained by the date of graduation from
high school. The amount of the supplemental award shall be determined as
follows:
ACT ACT
Score Amount Score Amount
15 $36 22 $286
16 $71 23 $321
Page 5 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
17 $107 24 $357
18 $143 25 $393
19 $179 26 $428
20 $214 27 $464
21 $250 28 and above $500
[ The authority shall review the base amount of the supplemental award
beginning with the 2001-2002 academic year and each academic year
thereafter and may promulgate an administrative regulation to make
adjustments after considering the availability of funds.]
(b)[(c)] [Beginning with the 2008-2009 academic year, ]The authority shall
commit to provide a supplemental award for achievement on examinations for
Advanced Placement or International Baccalaureate as defined in KRS
164.002 to an eligible high school student whose family was eligible for free
or reduced-price lunch for any year during high school enrollment.
1. The supplemental award for AP examination scores are as follows:
a. Two hundred dollars ($200) for each score of three (3);
b. Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each score of four (4); and
c. Three hundred dollars ($300) for each score of five (5).
2. The supplemental award for IB examination scores are as follows:
a. Two hundred dollars ($200) for each score of five (5);
b. Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each score of six (6); and
c. Three hundred dollars ($300) for each score of seven (7).
(c)[(d)] [Beginning with the 2013-2014 academic year, ]The authority shall
commit to provide a supplemental award for achievement on examinations for
Cambridge Advanced International as defined in KRS 164.002 to an eligible
high school student whose family was eligible for free or reduced-priced
lunch for any year during high school enrollment. The supplemental award for
Page 6 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
Cambridge Advanced International examination scores are as follows:
1. Two hundred dollars ($200) for each score of "e";
2. Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each score of "c" or "d"; and
3. Three hundred dollars ($300) for each score of "a*", "a", or "b".
(d)[(e)] The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing
the eligibility criteria and procedures for making a supplemental award to
Kentucky residents who are citizens, nationals, or permanent residents of the
United States and who graduate from a nonpublic secondary school not
certified by the Kentucky Board of Education and Kentucky residents who are
citizens, nationals, or permanent residents of the United States and who obtain
a High School Equivalency Diploma within five (5) years of their high school
graduating class, and students under subsection (2)(c) of this section who do
not attend an accredited high school.
(e) Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, the base amount of the
supplemental awards in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection:
1. May be annually adjusted by the authority based on the most recent
percent increase in the nonseasonally adjusted annual average
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City
Average, All Items, between the two (2) most recent calendar years
available, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics
by administrative regulation, subject to the availability of funds,
beginning with examination scores attained in the 2018-2019
academic year and each academic year thereafter;
2. May be increased, but shall not be decreased;
3. Shall be paid at the most recent amount calculated for the academic
term in which a student utilizes his or her award;
4. Shall be provided at the adjusted amount identified in subparagraph 1.
Page 7 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
of this paragraph for eligible high school students who graduated
prior to the 2021-2022 academic year and have received an eligibility
extension by the authority pursuant to subsection (5) of Section 3 of
this Act; and
5. Shall not be made available for retroactive payments due to an award
amount adjustment, pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph,
for prior academic terms.
Section 2. KRS 164.7874 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.7871 to 164.7885:
(1) "Academic term" means a semester or other time period specified in an
administrative regulation promulgated by the authority;
(2) "Academic year" means a period consisting of at least the minimum school term, as
defined in KRS 158.070;
(3) "ACT score" means the composite score achieved on the American College Test at
a national test site on a national test date or the college admissions examination
administered statewide under KRS 158.6453(5)(b)5. if the exam is the ACT, or an
equivalent score, as determined by the authority, on the SAT administered by the
College Board, Inc.;
(4) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(5) "Award period" means the fall and spring consecutive academic terms within one
(1) academic year;
(6) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education created under KRS
164.011;
(7) "Eligible high school student" means any person who:
(a) Is a citizen, national, or permanent resident of the United States and Kentucky
resident;
(b) Was enrolled after July 1, 1998:
Page 8 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
1. In a Kentucky high school for at least one hundred forty (140) days of
the minimum school term unless exempted by the authority's executive
director upon documentation of extreme hardship, while meeting the
KEES curriculum requirements, and was enrolled in a Kentucky high
school at the end of the academic year;
2. In a Kentucky high school for the fall academic term of the senior year
and who:
a. Was enrolled during the entire academic term;
b. Completed the high school's graduation requirements during the
fall academic term; and
c. Was not enrolled in a secondary school during any other academic
term of that academic year; or
3. In the Gatton Academy of Mathematics and Science in Kentucky, the
Craft Academy for Excellence in Science and Mathematics, or in high
school at a model and practice school under KRS 164.380 while meeting
the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship curriculum
requirements;
(c) Has a grade point average of 2.5 or above at the end of any academic year
beginning after July 1, 1998, or at the end of the fall academic term for a
student eligible under paragraph (b)2.[(b) 2.] of this subsection; and
(d) Is not a convicted felon;
(8) "Eligible postsecondary student" means a citizen, national, or permanent resident of
the United States and Kentucky resident, as determined by the participating
institution in accordance with criteria established by the council for the purposes of
admission and tuition assessment, who:
(a) Earned a KEES award;
(b) Has the required postsecondary GPA and credit hours required under KRS
Page 9 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
164.7881;
(c) Has remaining semesters of eligibility under KRS 164.7881;
(d) Is enrolled in a participating institution as a part-time or full-time student; and
(e) Is not a convicted felon;
(9) "Full-time student" means a student enrolled in a postsecondary program of study
that meets the full-time student requirements of the participating institution in
which the student is enrolled;
(10) "Grade point average" or "GPA" means the grade point average earned by an
eligible student and reported by the high school or participating institution in which
the student was enrolled based on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent if the high school
or participating institution that the student attends does not use the 4.0 grade scale;
(11) "High school" means any Kentucky public high school, the Gatton Academy of
Mathematics and Science in Kentucky, the Craft Academy for Excellence in
Science and Mathematics, a high school of a model and practice school under KRS
164.380, and any private, parochial, or church school located in Kentucky that has
been certified by the Kentucky Board of Education as voluntarily complying with
curriculum, certification, and textbook standards established by the Kentucky Board
of Education under KRS 156.160;
(12) "KEES" or "Kentucky educational excellence scholarship" means a scholarship
provided under KRS 164.7871 to 164.7885;
(13) "KEES award" means:
(a) For an eligible high school student, the sum of the KEES base amount for
each academic year of high school plus any KEES supplemental amount, as
adjusted pursuant to KRS 164.7881; and
(b) For a student eligible under KRS 164.7879(3)(d)[(e)], the KEES supplemental
amount as adjusted pursuant to KRS 164.7881;
(14) "KEES award maximum" means the sum of the KEES base amount earned in each
Page 10 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
academic year of high school plus any KEES supplemental amount earned;
(15) "KEES base amount" or "base amount" means the amount earned by an eligible
high school student based on the student's GPA pursuant to KRS 164.7879;
(16) "KEES curriculum" means five (5) courses of study, except for students who meet
the criteria of subsection (7)(b)2. of this section, in an academic year as determined
in accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by the authority;
(17) "KEES supplemental amount" means the amount earned by an eligible student
based on the student's ACT score pursuant to KRS 164.7879;
(18) "KEES trust fund" means the Wallace G. Wilkinson Kentucky educational
excellence scholarship trust fund;
(19) "On track to graduate" means the number of cumulative credit hours earned as
compared to the number of hours determined by the postsecondary education
institution as necessary to complete a bachelor's degree by the end of eight (8)
academic terms or ten (10) academic terms if a student is enrolled in an
undergraduate program that requires five (5) years of study;
(20) "Participating institution" means an "institution" as defined in KRS 164.001 that is
eligible to participate in the federal Pell Grant program, executes a contract with the
authority on terms the authority deems necessary or appropriate for the
administration of its programs, and:
(a) 1. Is publicly operated;
2. Is licensed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky and has operated for at
least ten (10) years, offers an associate or baccalaureate degree program
of study not comprised solely of sectarian instruction, and admits as
regular students only high school graduates, recipients of a High School
Equivalency Diploma, or students transferring from another accredited
degree granting institution; or
3. Is designated by the authority as an approved out-of-state institution that
Page 11 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
offers a degree program in a field of study that is not offered at any
institution in the Commonwealth; and
(b) Continues to commit financial resources to student financial assistance
programs; and
(21) "Part-time student" means a student enrolled in a postsecondary program of study
who does not meet the full-time student requirements of the participating institution
in which the student is enrolled and who is enrolled for at least six (6) credit hours,
or the equivalent for an institution that does not use credit hours.
Section 3. KRS 164.7881 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Eligible high school students who have graduated from high school and eligible
postsecondary students who have earned a Kentucky educational excellence
scholarship, a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship and a supplemental
award, or a supplemental award only pursuant to KRS 164.7879(3)(d)[(e)], shall be
eligible to receive the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship, the Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship and the supplemental award, or a supplemental
award only for a maximum of eight (8) academic terms in an undergraduate or other
postsecondary program of study at a participating institution, except as provided in
subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(2) To receive the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship, a Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship and supplemental award, or a supplemental
award only, an eligible high school or postsecondary student shall:
(a) Enroll in and attend a participating institution as a full-time student or a part-
time student; and
(b) Maintain eligibility as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Eligibility for a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship or a Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship and supplemental award shall terminate upon
the earlier of:
Page 12 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
(a) The expiration of five (5) years following the student's graduation from high
school, except as provided in subsection (5) or (6) of this section; or
(b) The successful completion of an undergraduate or other postsecondary course
of study. However, any student who successfully completes the requirements
for a degree or certification involving a postsecondary course of study that
normally requires less than eight (8) academic terms to complete may
continue to receive the benefits of a Kentucky educational excellence
scholarship, a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship and supplemental
award, or a supplemental award only, for a cumulative total of eight (8)
academic terms if the student enrolls as at least a part-time student in a four
(4) year program.
(4) (a) The maximum award amount shall be determined by the authority and shall
be adjusted as provided in this subsection. The award amount ultimately
determined to be available to an eligible postsecondary student for an award
period shall be delivered by the authority to the participating institution for
disbursement to the eligible postsecondary student.
(b) The authority shall, by promulgation of administrative regulations, provide for
the proportionate reduction of the maximum award amount for an eligible
postsecondary student for any academic term in which the student is enrolled
on a part-time basis. Each academic term for which any scholarship or
supplemental award funds are accepted by an eligible postsecondary student
shall count as a full academic term, even if the award amount was reduced to
reflect the part-time status of the eligible postsecondary student, except if the
eligible postsecondary student interrupts enrollment during the award period
for any reason specified in subsection (5) of this section, and the participating
institution does not certify a cumulative grade point average for that student at
the end of that award period.
Page 13 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
(c) 1. An eligible postsecondary student who is enrolled full-time in an
undergraduate program of study, in the pharmacy program at the
University of Kentucky, or in a program of study designated as an
equivalent undergraduate program of study by the authority in an
administrative regulation, shall receive the maximum award amount for
the first award period that the student is enrolled in and attending the
program of study.
2. To retain the maximum award for the second award period, an eligible
postsecondary student shall have at least a 2.5 grade point average at the
end of the first award period. If the eligible postsecondary student
interrupts enrollment during the award period for any reason specified in
subsection (5) of this section, and the participating institution does not
certify a cumulative grade point average for that student at the end of
that award period, the eligible postsecondary student shall, subject to
paragraph (b) of this subsection, retain the maximum award for the
award period in which he or she resumes enrollment.
3. To retain the maximum award amount for subsequent award periods, an
eligible postsecondary student shall have:
a. A cumulative grade point average of 3.0 or greater at the end of
the prior award period. If the eligible postsecondary student
interrupts enrollment during the award period for any reason
specified in subsection (5) of this section, and the participating
institution does not certify a cumulative grade point average for
that student at the end of that award period, the eligible
postsecondary student shall, subject to paragraph (b) of this
subsection, retain the same award for the award period in which he
or she resumes enrollment as he or she received in the award
Page 14 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
period in which enrollment was interrupted; or
b. A cumulative grade point average of 2.5 or greater but less than
3.0 at the end of the prior award period and be on track to
graduate. If the eligible postsecondary student interrupts
enrollment during the award period for any reason specified in
subsection (5) of this section, and the participating institution does
not certify a cumulative grade point average for that student at the
end of that award period, the eligible postsecondary student shall,
subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, retain the same award
for the award period in which he or she resumes enrollment as he
or she received in the award period in which enrollment was
interrupted.
4. Any eligible full-time postsecondary student who maintains a
cumulative grade point average of less than 3.0 but at least 2.5 but is not
on track to graduate at the completion of any award period shall receive
a reduction in the maximum award amount equal to fifty percent (50%)
of the maximum award amount for the next award period.
5. Any eligible postsecondary student who maintains a cumulative grade
point average of less than 2.5 at the completion of any award period
shall lose his or her award for the next award period.
6. a. Each participating institution shall certify to the authority at the
close of each award period the cumulative grade point average of
each Kentucky educational excellence scholarship recipient
enrolled as a full-time or part-time student at the participating
institution.
b. In addition to reporting the grade point average, beginning with
the 2010-2011 academic year, each participating institution shall
Page 15 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
certify to the authority at the close of each award period whether a
Kentucky educational excellence scholarship recipient who
initially enrolled in college in 2009-2010 or thereafter is on track
to graduate.
7. Any student who loses eligibility through failure to maintain the
required cumulative grade point average may regain eligibility in a
subsequent award period upon reestablishing at least a 2.5 cumulative
grade point average or its equivalent during a subsequent award period,
as certified by the participating institution.
(5) The expiration of a student's eight (8) academic terms and five (5) year eligibility
shall be extended by the authority upon a determination that the student was unable
to enroll for or complete an academic term due to any of the following
circumstances:
(a) A serious and extended illness or injury of the student, certified by an
attending physician;
(b) The death or serious and extended illness or injury of an immediate family
member of the student, certified by an attending physician, which would
render the student unable to attend classes;
(c) Natural disasters that would render a student unable to attend classes; or
(d) 1. Active duty status for the student in the United States Armed Forces or
as an officer in the Commissioned Corps of the United States Public
Health Service, or active service by the student in the Peace Corps Act
or the Americorps, for the total number of years during which the
student was on active duty status. The number of months served on
active duty status shall be rounded up to the next higher year to
determine the maximum length of eligibility extension allowed.
2. A student whose eligibility expired prior to July 15, 2008, due to the
Page 16 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
three (3) year time limit on eligibility extensions imposed by this
paragraph prior to July 15, 2008, shall have his or her eligibility
reinstated for the number of years beyond the three (3) years during
which he or she was on active duty status. The number of months served
on active duty status shall be rounded up to the next higher year to
determine the maximum length of eligibility extension allowed.
(6) An eligible postsecondary student who is enrolled at a participating institution in a
five (5) year undergraduate degree program designated in an administrative
regulation promulgated by the authority shall be eligible to receive the Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship, the Kentucky educational excellence
scholarship and the supplemental award, or the supplemental award only for a
maximum of ten (10) academic terms. The expiration of an eligible postsecondary
student's five (5) year eligibility shall be extended to six (6) years for eligible
postsecondary students meeting the requirements of this subsection.
(7) Each participating institution shall notify its students of their terms of eligibility.
(8) Each eligible high school student who attains a 28 or above on the ACT and a 4.0
grade point average for all four (4) years of high school shall be designated as a
"Senator Jeff Green Scholar" in honor of the late Senator Jeff Green of Mayfield,
Kentucky, First District, and shall be recognized by the high school in a manner
consistent with recognition given by the high school to other high levels of
academic achievement.
Section 4. KRS 164.7884 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Academic year" means July 1 through June 30 of each year;
(b) "Apprentice" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010;
(c) "Approved workforce solutions training program" means a local high-demand
work sector training program that is approved by the authority and is offered
Page 17 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
by the Kentucky Community and Technical College System through
consultation with representatives of the local workforce development area and
the local Kentucky Community and Technical College System campus where
the program will be offered;
(d) "Eligible college of art and design" means a college that:
1. Qualifies as a tax exempt organization pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code:
2. Is conditionally or unconditionally licensed by the Council on
Postsecondary Education;
3. Is a candidate for accreditation by a regional accrediting association
recognized by the United States Department of Education;
4. Has its main campus physically located in Kentucky;
5. Limits its degree program offerings to the area of fine arts; and
6. Does not qualify as a participating institution as defined in KRS
164.7874;
(e) "Eligible student" means an eligible high school student who has graduated
from high school or a student eligible under KRS 164.7879(3)(d)[(e)];
(f) "Proprietary school" means a school that:
1. Is licensed by the Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education;
2. Has operated for at least five (5) years;
3. Has its headquarters or main campus physically located in Kentucky;
and
4. Does not qualify as a participating institution under KRS 164.7874(20);
(g) "Qualified proprietary school program" means a program offered by a
proprietary school that is in the field of agriculture as defined in KRS 246.010
or is in one (1) of Kentucky's top five (5) high-demand work sectors as
determined by the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board;
Page 18 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
(h) "Qualified workforce training program" means a program that is in one (1) of
Kentucky's top five (5) high-demand work sectors as determined by the
Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board;
(i) "Registered apprenticeship program" means an apprenticeship program that:
1. Is established in accordance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 343;
2. Requires a minimum of two thousand (2,000) hours of on-the-job work
experience;
3. Requires a minimum of one hundred forty-four (144) hours of related
instruction for each year of the apprenticeship; and
4. Is approved by the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(j) "Related instruction" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010; and
(k) "Sponsor" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 164.7881, an eligible student who earned a KEES award
shall be eligible for a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship if the student
meets the requirements of this section and is:
(a) An apprentice in a registered apprenticeship program;
(b) Enrolled in a qualified workforce training program that has a current
articulation agreement for postsecondary credit hours with a participating
institution;
(c) Enrolled in a qualified proprietary school program;
(d) Enrolled in an approved workforce solutions training program; or
(e) Enrolled in an eligible college of art and design.
(3) (a) Beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year, an eligible student enrolled in a
registered apprenticeship program or, for the academic year beginning July 1,
2020, an eligible student enrolled in a qualified workforce training program
or, for the academic year beginning July 1, 2023, an eligible student enrolled
in a qualified proprietary school program, an approved workforce solutions
Page 19 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 922
training program, or an eligible college of art and design, may receive
reimbursement of tuition, books, required tools, and other approved expenses
required for participation in the program, upon certification by the sponsor,
school, or college and approval by the authority.
(b) The reimbursement amount an eligible student may receive in an academic
year shall not exceed the student's KEES award maximum.
(c) The total reimbursement amount an eligible student may receive under this
section shall not exceed the student's KEES award maximum multiplied by
four (4).
(4) Eligibility for a KEES scholarship under this section shall terminate upon the earlier
of:
(a) The expiration of five (5) years following the eligible student's graduation
from high school or receiving a High School Equivalency Diploma, except as
provided in KRS 164.7881(5); or
(b) The eligible student's successful completion of the registered apprenticeship
program, qualified workforce training program, qualified proprietary school
program, or approved workforce solutions training program.
(5) The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the
procedures for making awards under this section in consultation with the[
Kentucky] Education and Labor Cabinet and the Cabinet for[ Kentucky] Economic
Development[ Cabinet].
Page 20 of 20
XXXX 11/26/2025 3:27 PM Jacketed